California, session 20252026, AB2720.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13657 is added to the Penal Code, to read:13657. (a) (1) Each law enforcement agency that employs more than 25 full-time sworn peace officers shall designate at least one human trafficking victim support coordinator by no later than January 1, 2028.(2) A human trafficking victim support coordinator may be a nonsworn employee.(b) A human trafficking victim support coordinator shall take the course of instruction described in Section 13519.14 no later than six months after designation. designation, unless the human trafficking victim support coordinator is a sworn peace officer that has taken the course within the past five years. Upon completion of the course, the human trafficking victim support coordinator shall serve as a liaison between the law enforcement agency, trusted community-based organizations organizations, and victims.(c) By July 1, 2028, each law enforcement agency subject to subdivision (a) shall display on their internet website the following information:(1) A list of trusted community-based organizations available to support human trafficking victims within the agency’s jurisdiction.(2) If applicable pursuant to subdivision (a), the The email address and the direct office phone telephone line of any designated human trafficking victim support coordinators.(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Human trafficking” means a violation of Section 236.1 of the Penal Code.(2) “Law enforcement agency” means any department or agency of the state, or any local government, special district, or other political subdivision thereof, that employs any peace officer, as described in Section 830. a local police department or sheriff’s office that employs at least 25 full-time sworn peace officers, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and the Department of Justice.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.